California statutes. Education Code
(a) For purposes of receiving state apportionments, a community college district may include high school students who attend a community college within the district pursuant to Sections 48800, 52620, and 76001 in the district’s report of full-time equivalent students (FTES) only if those students are enrolled in community college classes that meet all
 of the following criteria:

(1) The class is open to the general public.

(2) (A) The class is advertised as open to the general public in one or more of the following:

(i) The college catalog.

(ii) The regular schedule of classes.

(iii) An addenda to the college catalog or regular schedule of classes.

(B) If a decision to offer a class on a high school campus is made after the publication of the regular schedule of classes, and the class is solely advertised to the general public through electronic media, the class shall be so advertised for a minimum of 30 continuous days
 before the first meeting of the class.

(3) If the class is offered at a high school campus, the class shall not be held during the time the campus is closed to the general public, as defined by the governing board of the school district during a regularly scheduled board meeting.

(4) If the class is a physical education class, no more than 10 percent of its enrollment may be comprised of special part-time or full-time students. A community college district shall not receive state apportionments for special part-time and full-time students enrolled in physical education courses in excess of 5 percent of the district’s total reported full-time equivalent enrollment of special part-time and full-time students.

(b) The governing board of a community college district may restrict the admission or
 enrollment of a special part-time or full-time student during any session based on any of the following criteria:

(1) Age.

(2) Completion of a specified grade level.

(3) Demonstrated eligibility for instruction using assessment methods and procedures established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 78210) of Part 48 and regulations adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(c) (1) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall prepare and submit to the Department of Finance and the Legislature, on or before March 1, 2004, and March 1 of each year thereafter, a report on the amount of FTES claimed by each community college district for special part-time and special full-time
 students for the preceding academic year in each of the following class categories:

(A) Noncredit.

(B) Nondegree-applicable.

(C) Degree-applicable, excluding physical education.

(D) Degree-applicable physical education.

(2) The report prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) may include information required to be reported pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 48800.

(d) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall adopt rules and regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 528, Sec. 3.   (SB 554)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

76003.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 76001, the governing board of the Long Beach Community College District may admit to any community college under its jurisdiction, as a special part-time or full-time student, in any session or term, any student who is participating in the partnership established pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 48810) of Chapter 5 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(b) (1) For the purpose of receiving state apportionments pursuant to Section 76002, the Long Beach Community College District may include high school pupils who attend a community college within the district and participate in the College Promise Partnership Act
 pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 48810) of Chapter 5 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 in the district’s report of full-time equivalent students (FTES), provided that no school district has received reimbursement for the same instructional activity.

(2) The Long Beach Community College District shall report to the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges the moneys utilized for the partnership pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 48810) of Chapter 5 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 by no later than November 1 of each year the partnership is in operation.

(c) Credit for
 partnership courses completed shall be at the level determined to be appropriate by the governing boards of the Long Beach Unified School District and the Long Beach Community College District pursuant to the terms of the partnership established pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 48810) of Chapter 5 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(d) The Long Beach Community College District may assign priority for enrollment and course registration to any of the following:

(1) Students pursuing and making satisfactory academic progress toward a degree, certificate, transfer, or basic skills objective that is declared or reaffirmed upon enrollment in each academic term.

(2) Students pursuing and making satisfactory
 academic progress pursuant to an approved individual education plan toward a career development objective that is declared or reaffirmed upon enrollment in each academic term.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 76001, students participating in a partnership in accordance with Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 48810) of Chapter 5 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 762, Sec. 3.   (AB 1533)   Effective October 13, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

76004.

Notwithstanding Section 76001 or any other law:

(a) (1) The governing board of a community college district may enter into a College and Career Access Pathways (CCAP) partnership with the governing board of a school district or a county office of education for the purpose of offering or expanding dual enrollment opportunities for pupils who may not already be college bound or who are underrepresented in higher education, with the goal of developing seamless pathways from high school to community college for career technical education or preparation for transfer, improving high school graduation rates, or helping high school pupils achieve college and career readiness.

(2) As used in this section,
 “high school” includes a community school, continuation high school, juvenile court school, or adult education program offering courses for high school diplomas or high school equivalency certificates.

(3) As used in this section, “underrepresented in higher education” may include first-time college students, low-income students, students who are current or former foster youth, homeless students, students with disabilities, and students with dependent children.

(b) A participating community college district may enter into a CCAP partnership with a school district or county office of education partner that is governed by a CCAP partnership agreement approved by the governing boards of both partners. As a condition of adopting a CCAP partnership agreement, the governing board of each partner shall do both of the following:

(1) For career technical education pathways to be provided under the partnership, consult with, and consider the input of, the appropriate local workforce development board to determine the extent to which the pathways are aligned with regional and statewide employment needs. The governing board of each partner shall have final decisionmaking authority regarding the career technical education pathways to be provided under the partnership.

(2) Present, take comments from the public on, and approve or disapprove the dual enrollment partnership agreement at an open public meeting of the governing board of the partner.

(c) (1) The CCAP partnership agreement shall outline the terms of the CCAP partnership, and shall include, but not be limited to, the total number of high school pupils to be served and the total number of full-time equivalent students
 projected to be claimed by the community college district for those pupils; the scope, nature, time, location, and listing of community college courses to be offered; and criteria to assess the ability of pupils to benefit from those courses. The CCAP partnership agreement shall also establish protocols for information sharing, in compliance with all applicable state and federal privacy laws, joint facilities use, and parental consent for high school pupils to enroll in community college courses. The protocols shall only require a high school pupil participating in a CCAP partnership to submit one parental consent form and principal recommendation for the duration of the pupil’s participation in the CCAP partnership.

(2) The CCAP partnership agreement shall identify a point of contact for the participating community college district and school district or county office of education partner.

(3) A copy of the CCAP partnership agreement shall be filed with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and with the department before the start of the CCAP partnership. The chancellor may void any CCAP partnership agreement it determines has not complied with the intent of the requirements of this section.

(d) A community college district participating in a CCAP partnership shall not provide physical education course opportunities to high school pupils pursuant to this section, or any other course opportunities that do not assist in the attainment of at least one of the goals listed in subdivision (a).

(e) A community college district shall allow an existing CCAP partnership to be amended, or a new CCAP agreement to be established with a school district or county office of education and a community college district outside of the primary
 community college district’s service area, if the primary community college district has declined a request from the school district or county office of education, or has failed to take action within 60 calendar days of a request by the school district or county office of education, to either amend into the existing CCAP partnership the requested courses, or to approve another community college district to enter into a CCAP partnership to offer those courses.

(f) A high school pupil enrolled in a course offered through a CCAP partnership shall not be assessed any fee by a local educational agency or community college district that is prohibited by Section 49011.

(g) (1) A community college district participating in a CCAP partnership shall assign
 priority for enrollment and course registration to a pupil seeking to enroll in a community college course that is required for the pupil’s CCAP partnership program that is equivalent to the priority assigned to a pupil attending a middle college high school as described in Section 11300 and consistent with the middle college high school provisions in Section 76001.

(2) Units completed by a pupil pursuant to a CCAP partnership agreement may count towards determining a pupil’s registration priority for enrollment and course registration at a community college.

(h) The CCAP partnership agreement shall certify that any community college instructor teaching a course on a high school campus has not been convicted of any sex offense as defined in Section 87010, or convicted of any controlled substance offense as defined in Section 87011.

(i) The CCAP partnership agreement shall certify that any community college instructor teaching a course at the partnering high school campus has not displaced or resulted in the termination of an existing high school teacher teaching the same course on that high school campus.

(j) The CCAP partnership agreement shall certify that a qualified high school teacher teaching a course offered for college credit at a high school campus has not displaced or resulted in the termination of an existing community college faculty member teaching the same course at the partnering community college campus.

(k) The CCAP partnership agreement shall include a plan by the participating community college district to ensure both of the following:

(1) A community college course
 offered for college credit at the partnering high school campus does not reduce access to the same course offered at the partnering community college campus.

(2) Participation in a CCAP partnership is consistent with the core mission of the community colleges as described in Section 66010.4, and that pupils participating in a CCAP partnership will not lead to enrollment displacement of otherwise eligible adults in the community college.

(l) The CCAP partnership agreement shall certify that both the school district or county office of education and community college district partners comply with local collective bargaining agreements and all state and federal reporting requirements regarding the qualifications of the teacher or faculty member teaching a CCAP partnership course offered for high school credit.

(m) The
 CCAP partnership agreement shall specify both of the following:

(1) Which partner will be the employer of record for purposes of assignment monitoring and reporting to the county office of education.

(2) Which partner will assume reporting responsibilities pursuant to applicable federal teacher quality mandates.

(n) The CCAP partnership agreement shall certify that any pretransfer-level course taught by community college faculty at a partnering high school campus shall be offered only to high school pupils who do not meet their grade level standard in mathematics, English, or both on an interim assessment in grade 10 or 11, as determined by the partnering school district or county office of education, and shall involve a collaborative effort between high school and community college faculty to deliver an innovative
 pretransfer course as an intervention in the pupil’s junior or senior year to ensure that the pupil is prepared for college-level work upon graduation.

(o) (1) A community college district may limit enrollment in a community college course solely to eligible high school pupils if the course is offered at a high school campus, either in person or using an online platform, during the regular schoolday and the community college course is offered pursuant to a CCAP partnership agreement.

(2) For purposes of allowances and apportionments from Section B of the State School Fund, a community college district conducting a closed course on a high school campus pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be credited with those units of full-time equivalent students attributable to the attendance of eligible high school pupils.

(p) A community college district may allow a special part-time student participating in a CCAP partnership agreement established pursuant to this article to enroll in up to a maximum of 15 units per term in courses offered at the community college campus or the participating high school campus, if all of the following circumstances are satisfied:

(1) The units constitute no more than four community college courses per term.

(2) The units are part of an academic program that is part of a CCAP partnership agreement established pursuant to this article.

(3) The units are part of an academic program that is designed to award students both a high school diploma and an associate degree or a certificate or credential.

(q) The governing board of a
 community college district participating in a CCAP partnership agreement established pursuant to this article shall exempt pupils seeking to enroll in a community college course required for the pupil’s CCAP partnership program from the fee requirements in Sections 76060.5, 76223, 76300, 76350, and 79121.

(r) The governing board of a community college district participating in a CCAP partnership agreement shall enroll high school pupils in any course that is part of a CCAP partnership agreement offered at a community college campus. Courses offered through the CCAP program may be offered at the community college campus or the participating high school campus.

(s) A district or county office of education shall not receive a state allowance or apportionment for an instructional activity for which the partner has been, or shall be, paid an allowance or apportionment.

(t) (1) The attendance of a high school pupil at a community college as a special part-time or full-time student pursuant to this section is authorized attendance for which the community college shall be credited or reimbursed pursuant to Section 48802 or 76002, provided that no school district or county office of education has received reimbursement for the same instructional activity.

(2) For purposes of calculating classroom-based average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by a charter school pursuant to an authorized CCAP partnership agreement shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of a pupil for a minimum of 50 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section
 47612.5, if the pupil is also a special part-time student enrolled in a community college pursuant to this section and the pupil will receive academic credit upon satisfactory completion of enrolled courses.

(u) (1) For each CCAP partnership agreement entered into pursuant to this section, the affected community college district and school district or county office of education shall report annually to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges all of the following information:

(A) The total number of high school pupils by schoolsite enrolled in each CCAP partnership, aggregated by gender and ethnicity, and reported in compliance with all applicable state and federal privacy laws.

(B) The total number of community college courses, by course category and type and by
 schoolsite, enrolled in by CCAP partnership participants.

(C) The total number and percentage of successful course completions, by course category and type and by schoolsite, of CCAP partnership participants.

(D) The total number of full-time equivalent students generated by CCAP partnership community college district participants.

(E) The total number of full-time equivalent students served online generated by CCAP partnership community college district participants.

(2) On or before May 1 of each year, the chancellor shall aggregate the information annually reported pursuant to paragraph (1) and submit a report of that information to all of the following:

(A) The Legislature, in
 compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(B) The Director of Finance.

(C) The Superintendent.

(3) The chancellor shall ensure that the number of full-time equivalent students generated by CCAP partnerships is reported pursuant to the reporting requirements in Section 76002.

(4) On or before July 31, 2020, the chancellor shall revise the special part-time student application process to allow a pupil to complete one application for the duration of the pupil’s attendance at a community college as a special part-time student participating in a CCAP partnership agreement.

(v) A community college district that violates this article, including, but not limited to, any restriction
 imposed by the board of governors pursuant to this article, shall be subject to the same penalty as may be imposed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 78032.

(w) This section does not affect a dual enrollment partnership agreement existing on January 1, 2016, under which an early college high school, a middle college high school, or a California Career Pathways Trust existing on January 1, 2016, is operated. An early college high school, middle college high school, or California Career Pathways Trust partnership agreement existing on January 1, 2016, shall not operate as a CCAP partnership unless it complies with this section.

(x) The governing body of a charter school may enter into a CCAP partnership agreement with the governing board of a community college district pursuant to this section. That CCAP partnership agreement shall comply with all applicable requirements of this
 section.

(y) The governing body of a regional occupational center or program may enter into a CCAP partnership agreement with the governing board of a community college district pursuant to this section. That CCAP partnership agreement shall comply with all applicable requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 132.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Student Housing [76010. - 76011.]

76010.

(a) In order to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth who are students at the campuses of the California Community Colleges have stable housing, each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities is requested to give priority for housing to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth. In addition, each campus of the California Community Colleges that maintains student housing facilities open for occupation during school breaks, or on a year-round basis, is requested to give first priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for residence in the housing facilities that are open for uninterrupted year-round occupation and provide this housing to
 current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth at no extra cost during academic or campus breaks, and next give priority to current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth for housing that is open for occupation during the most days in the calendar year.

 (b) In addition, each campus of the California Community Colleges is requested to develop a plan to ensure that current and former homeless youth and current and former foster youth can access housing resources as needed during and between academic terms, including during academic and campus breaks, regardless of whether the campus maintains student housing facilities.

(c) As used in this section, a “homeless youth” means a student under 25 years of age, who has been verified, in the case of a former homeless youth, at any time during the 24 months immediately preceding the receipt of
 his or her application for admission by a campus of the California Community Colleges, as a homeless child or youth, as defined in subsection (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), by at least one of the following:

(1) A homeless services provider, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The director, or his or her designee, of a federal TRIO program or a Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs program.

(3) A financial aid administrator.

(d) For purposes of this section, a student who is verified as a former homeless youth pursuant to subdivision (c) shall retain that status for a period of six years from the
 date of admission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 571, Sec. 2.   (AB 1228)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76011.

(a) If a community college campus has shower facilities for student use on campus, the governing board of the community college district shall grant access to those facilities to any homeless student who is enrolled in coursework, has paid enrollment fees, and is in good standing with the community college district without requiring the student to enroll in additional courses.

(b) The governing board shall determine a plan of action to implement subdivision (a) that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Hours of operation for the shower facilities, consistent with subdivision (c). 

(2) The minimum number of units a student must be enrolled in to use the facilities.

(3) A plan of action if hours of operation conflict with an intercollegiate athletic program.

(4) A definition of homeless student that is based on the definition of homeless youth specified in the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), but also reflects the age of the homeless student population at the community college campus.

(c) Hours of operation shall be consistent with hours of operation of the facilities in which the showers are
 located, shall be set at a minimum of two hours per weekday, and shall not conflict with the intercollegiate athletic program of the campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 407, Sec. 1.   (AB 1995)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusion of Students [76020. - 76020.]

76020.

(a) The governing body of any community college district may exclude students of filthy or vicious habits, or students suffering from contagious or infectious diseases.

(b) The governing board of the community college may exclude from attendance on regular classes any student whose physical or mental disability is such as to cause his or her attendance to be inimical to the welfare of other students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 420.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Removal, Suspension, or Expulsion [76030. - 76038.]

76030.

(a) Consistent with requirements of due process of law, with this article, and with the rules of student conduct adopted by the governing board under Section 66300, the governing board, the president of a community college or the president’s designee, or an instructor shall suspend a student for good cause. In addition, the governing board is authorized to expel a student for good cause when other means of correction fail to bring about proper conduct, or when the presence of the student causes a continuing danger to the physical safety of the student or others. The suspension or expulsion of a student shall be accompanied by a hearing conducted pursuant to the requirements of Section 66017.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, if an order requested by a community college district to protect a campus of a community college district or any person regularly present on a campus of that district is issued upon a finding of good cause by a court against a student of that community college district, and the order prevents that student from attending classes and maintaining his or her academic standing, the community college district may require the student to apply for reinstatement after the expiration of that order. If the district requires the student to apply for reinstatement, it shall do so before the expiration of the protective order. If a student applies for reinstatement under this paragraph, a review with respect to the application shall be conducted. This review, at a minimum, shall include consideration of all of the following issues:

(A) The gravity of the offense.

(B) Evidence of subsequent offenses, if any.

(C) The likelihood that the student would cause substantial disruption if he or she is reinstated.

(2) The governing board of the community college district, or the person to whom authority is delegated pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 76038, shall take one of the following actions after conducting a review under paragraph (1):

(A) Deny reinstatement.

(B) Permit reinstatement.

(C) Permit conditional reinstatement and specify the conditions under which reinstatement will be permitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 121.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76031.

The adopted rules of student conduct may authorize the president of a community college or the president’s designee to suspend a student for good cause as follows:

(a) From one or more classes for a period of up to 10 days of instruction.

(b) From one or more classes for the remainder of the school term.

(c) From all classes and activities of the community college for one or more terms.

The adopted rules of student conduct shall prohibit a student from being enrolled in any community college in the district for the period of suspension.

The president of the community college shall report all suspension of students to the governing board or to the district superintendent.

Whenever a minor is suspended from a community college, the parent or guardian shall be notified in writing by the president or the president’s designee.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the president of a community college or the president’s designee from imposing a lesser disciplinary sanction than suspension. A lesser sanction may include, but need not be limited to, verbal or written reprimand, probation, or ineligibility to participate in extracurricular activities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76032.

The adopted rules of student conduct may authorize an instructor to remove a student from his or her class for the day of the removal and the next class meeting. The instructor shall immediately report the removal to the chief administrative officer for appropriate action.

If the student removed by an instructor is a minor, the college president or the president’s designee shall ask the parent or guardian of the student to attend a parent conference regarding the removal as soon as possible. If the instructor or the parent or guardian so requests, a college administrator shall attend the conference. During the period of removal, a student shall not be returned to the class from which he or she was removed without the concurrence of the instructor of the class.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76033.

As used in this article, “good cause” includes, but is not limited to, the following offenses, occurring while enrolled as a student:

(a) Continued disruptive behavior, continued willful disobedience, habitual profanity or vulgarity, or the open and persistent defiance of the authority of, or persistent abuse of, college personnel.

(b) Assault, battery, or any threat of force or violence upon a student or college personnel.

(c) Willful misconduct which results in injury or death to a student or college personnel or which results in cutting, defacing, or other injury to any real
 or personal property owned by the district.

(d) The use, sale, or possession on campus of, or presence on campus under the influence of, any controlled substance, or any poison classified as such by Schedule D in Section 4160 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) Willful or persistent smoking in any area where smoking has been prohibited by law or by regulation of the governing board.

(f) Persistent, serious misconduct where other means of correction have failed to bring about proper conduct.

(g) Sexual assault, defined as actual or attempted sexual contact with another person without that person’s consent, regardless of the victim’s affiliation with the community college, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Intentional touching of another person’s intimate parts without that person’s consent or other intentional sexual contact with another person without that person’s consent.

(2) Coercing, forcing, or attempting to coerce or force a person to touch another person’s intimate parts without that person’s consent.

(3) Rape, which includes penetration, no matter how slight, without the person’s consent, of either of the following:

(A) The vagina or anus of a person by any body part of another person or by an object.

(B) The mouth of a person by a sex organ of another person.

(h) Sexual exploitation, defined as a person taking
 sexual advantage of another person for the benefit of anyone other than that person without that person’s consent, regardless of the victim’s affiliation with the community college, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Prostituting another person.

(2) Recording images, including video or photograph, or audio of another person’s sexual activity, intimate body parts, or nakedness without that person’s consent.

(3) Distributing images, including video or photograph, or audio of another person’s sexual activity, intimate body parts, or nakedness, if the individual distributing the images or audio knows or should have known that the person depicted in the images or audio did not consent to the disclosure and objected to the disclosure.

(4) Viewing another person’s sexual activity, intimate body parts, or nakedness in a place where that person would have a reasonable expectation of privacy, without that person’s consent, and for the purpose of arousing or gratifying sexual desire.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 232, Sec. 1.   (SB 186)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76034.

(a) Except in response to conduct specified in subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 76033, no student shall be removed, suspended, or expelled unless the conduct for which the student is disciplined is related to college activity or college attendance.

(b) This section is not intended to limit provisions of federal law, or limit the ability of community college districts to take appropriate action under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 232, Sec. 2.   (SB 186)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

76035.

The president or the president’s designee at a community college shall, upon the suspension or expulsion of any student, notify the appropriate law enforcement authorities of the county or city in which the school is situated of any acts of the student which may be in violation of Section 245 of the Penal Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76036.

Any violation or violations of law, ordinance, regulation, or rule regulating, or pertaining to, the parking of vehicles, shall not be cause for the removal, suspension, or expulsion of a student from a community college.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76037.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the authority of a governing board to adopt additional rules and regulations which are not inconsistent with the requirements of this article. These additional rules may, among other things, prescribe specific rules and regulations governing student behavior, along with applicable penalties for violations of the adopted rules and regulations, and may prescribe appropriate due process procedures, including procedure by which students shall be informed of these rules and regulations.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1032, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

76038.

(a) If the governing board of a community college district receives an application for admission from an individual who has been expelled from another district pursuant to this article within the preceding five years, or who is undergoing expulsion procedures in another district, for any of the offenses listed in subdivision (b), before taking action to deny enrollment or permit conditional enrollment as authorized by subdivision (e), the governing board or delegate pursuant to subdivision (f) shall hold a hearing, conducted in accordance with this section and the applicable rules and regulations governing enrollment hearings authorized by this section and adopted in accordance with Section 66300, to determine whether that individual poses a
 continuing danger to the physical safety of the students and employees of the
 district.

(b) For purposes of this section, “offense” means one of the following:

(1) Committed or attempted to commit murder.

(2) Caused, attempted to cause serious, or threatened to cause physical injury to another person, including assault or battery as defined in Section 240 or 242 of the Penal Code, except in self-defense.

(3) Committed or attempted to commit a sexual assault as defined in Section 261, 266c, 286, 287, 288, or 289 of, or former Section 288a
 of, the Penal Code or committed sexual battery as defined in Section 243.4 of the Penal Code.

(4) Committed or attempted to commit kidnapping, or seized, confined, inveigled, enticed, decoyed, abducted, concealed, kidnapped, or carried away another person by any means with the intent to hold or detain that person for ransom or reward.

(5) Committed or attempted to commit robbery or extortion.

(6) Committed stalking as defined in Section 646.9 of the Penal Code.

(7) Unlawfully possessed, sold, or otherwise furnished a firearm, knife, explosive, or other dangerous object.

(c) A community college district may request information, and respond to a request for information, from another community college district to determine whether an applicant continues to pose a danger to the physical safety of others.

(d) A community college district may require a student seeking admission who has been previously expelled from a community college in the state for any of the actions listed in subdivision (b) to inform the district of his or her prior expulsion. Failure to do so may be considered by the district in determining whether to grant admission, and a written record of the fact may be maintained by the district with the applicant’s file.

(e) The governing board of a community college district, upon making a determination pursuant to subdivision (a),
 shall take into consideration evidence of subsequent offenses and rehabilitative efforts since the offense and may take any of the following actions:

(1) Deny enrollment.

(2) Permit enrollment.

(3) Permit conditional enrollment.

(f) The governing board of a community college district may delegate any authority under this section to the superintendent or president of a community college district, or his or her designee, or a threat assessment crisis response team pursuant to rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 66300.

(g) Before the governing board of a community college district takes
 action as authorized under this section, the governing board shall establish a formal appeals process for students denied enrollment to appeal the decision to the governing board. A student who is denied enrollment under subdivision (e) may appeal the decision to deny enrollment to the governing board of the community college district.

(h) This section shall not be construed to impose any duty on a community college district to review applicants for admission or review previously enrolled students, whether returning or continuing, or to conduct a hearing in response to the receipt of any information regarding a potential, former, or existing student.

(i) In accordance with Sections 815.2 and 820.2 of the Government Code, a community college district, a member of the governing
 board of a community college district, an officer or employee of a community college district, including a superintendent of a community college district, a president of a community college district, and the designee of a president or a superintendent, shall not be liable for an injury resulting from an exercise of discretion pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, an exercise of discretion not to conduct a hearing when a hearing is not required.

(j) This section shall not apply to the admission of students for whom a community college district has discretion to admit pursuant to Section 76000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 16.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)